Tennessee, session 114, HB1221.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-13-104(4), is amended by
deleting subdivision (B).
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-13-110(d), is amended by
deleting the subsection and substituting:
(d) The governing body of the public charter school may petition the authorizer
to amend the original charter agreement. Beginning July 1, 2021, the commission shall
determine the timelines for approval and the appeal process. If the authorizer is the
commission, then an appeal shall not be made of the commission's decision to deny a
petition to amend the charter agreement. The governing body of a public charter school
may petition the authorizer for voluntary termination of the charter agreement before the
charter agreement expires.
SECTION 3. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-13-142, is amended by deleting
subsections (a)-(g) and (i).
SECTION 4. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB1221
003145
- 1 -